Wisconsin, session 2025, AB633.
do enact as follows:AB633,11Section 1. 27.012 of the statutes is created to read:AB633,2,4227.012 Rights of Devil’s Lake State Park. (1) In this section, “Devil’s 3Lake State Park” means the state park in the town of Baraboo in Sauk County that 4includes the lake known to the Ho-Chunk people as Tee Wakącąk.AB633,2,55(2) Devil’s Lake State Park has rights, including all of the following:AB633,2,66(a) The right to naturally exist, flourish, regenerate, and evolve.AB633,2,77(b) The right to full restoration, recovery, and preservation.AB633,2,88(c) The right to abundant, pure, clean, unpolluted water.AB633,2,99(d) The right to natural groundwater recharge and surface water recharge.AB633,2,1010(e) The right to a healthy natural environment and natural biodiversity.AB633,2,1111(f) The right to natural water flow.AB633,2,1212(g) The right to perform its natural ecosystem functions.AB633,2,1413(h) The right to be free of activities that infringe upon the rights established 14under pars. (a) to (g).AB633,2,1615(3) (a) No government entity and no business may engage in activities that 16infringe upon the rights established in sub. (2).AB633,3,217(b) No agency or department of the state may conduct, authorize, license, 18permit, or fund any activities that infringe upon the rights established in sub. (2). 1This paragraph may not be construed to abrogate the department’s powers or 2duties under s. 27.01.AB633,3,73(4) (a) No later than one year after the effective date of this paragraph .... 4[LRB inserts date], each agency and department of the state shall review all 5existing and proposed agency or department activities, and all laws, administrative 6rules, and policies administered by the agency or department, to identify violations 7of sub. (2).AB633,3,108(b) No later than 2 years after the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB 9inserts date], each agency and department of the state shall take necessary steps to 10remedy any violation identified par. (a).AB633,3,1411(c) No later than one year after the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB 12inserts date], the department shall complete an environmental study of Devil’s 13Lake State Park, to include identification of degraded, damaged, or destroyed 14ecosystems or species.AB633,3,1715(d) No later than 5 years after the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB 16inserts date], the department shall complete a full restoration of Devil’s Lake State 17Park, beginning with any ecosystems or species identified in par. (c).AB633,3,1818(5) (a) The attorney general is authorized to enforce this section.AB633,3,2219(b) Any individual may file a legal action, or intervene in any legal action, in 20the name of Devil’s Lake State Park as the real party in interest, to enforce the 21provisions of this section. A legal action under this paragraph is not dependent on 22any action by the attorney general under par. (a).AB633,4,223(c) If a legal action is brought under par. (a) or (b), the party conducting the 24activity alleged to be in violation of sub. (2) bears the burden of proving that no 1violation exists. The court may not use a lack of scientific certainty as a reason to 2deny or postpone legal enforcement.AB633,4,43(6) (a) Any government entity or business that violates sub. (3) (a) shall be 4subject to a forfeiture of $1,000 for each violation. AB633,4,135(b) Any agency or department of the state, and any government entity or 6business, that violates sub. (3) shall be liable for damages caused to Devil’s Lake 7State Park by the violation. The court shall assess damages in the amount 8necessary to restore Devil’s Lake State Park to the condition that existed before the 9violation was committed or, if restoration is impractical, in the amount the court 10determines will adequately mitigate the damages caused by the violation. The 11damages assessed under this paragraph shall be credited to the conservation fund 12and set aside to be used exclusively for the restoration of state parks, with first 13priority given to restoration of Devil’s Lake State Park.AB633,4,1514(7) Nothing in this section may be construed to confer liabilities, duties, 15obligations, or responsibilities on Devil’s Lake State Park.AB633,4,1816(8) Nothing in this section may be construed to abrogate the rights of a 17federally recognized American Indian tribe or band in this state or the individual 18rights of its members.AB633,4,1919